Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 6. Alaska Heritage Endowment Fund.

Sec. 37.14.500.
Alaska heritage endowment fund established.

The Alaska heritage endowment fund is established as a separate endowment trust fund of the state. The principal of the fund consists of

legislative appropriations to the fund; and

gifts, bequests, and contributions of cash or other assets made by a person who has specified their placement in the fund principal.

History.

(§ 5 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.14.510.
Net income account.

The net income account is established in the Alaska heritage endowment fund. The net income account of the fund consists of

money and other assets given by persons to the fund whose placement in the principal of the fund is not required by AS

37.14.500

(2); and

amounts earned on the investment of gifts, bequests, and contributions of cash or other assets whose placement in the principal of the fund is required under AS

37.14.500

(2).

The legislature may appropriate from the net income account to the principal of the fund under AS

37.14.500

(1).

The net income of the fund shall be determined by the commissioner of revenue in accordance with investment accounting principles and in a manner that preserves the distinction between principal and income.

Unless otherwise provided by the act making an appropriation under (b) of this section, an amount appropriated to the net income account under (b) of this section does not lapse.

History.

(§ 5 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.14.520.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue.

The commissioner of revenue is the treasurer of the fund and has the power and duty to

act as official custodian of the cash and investments belonging to the fund by securing adequate and safe custodial facilities;

receive all items of cash and investments belonging to the fund;

collect the principal and income from investments owned or acquired by the fund and deposit the amounts in separate principal and income accounts for the fund;

invest and reinvest the assets of the fund as provided in this section and as provided for the investment of funds under AS

37.14.170

;

exercise the powers of an owner with respect to the assets of the fund;

maintain accounting records of the fund in accordance with investment accounting principles and with distinction between the principal and income accounts of the fund;

engage an independent firm of certified public accountants to annually audit the financial condition of the fund’s investments and investment transactions;

enter into and enforce contracts or agreements considered necessary for the investment purposes of the fund;

report to the commission the condition and investment performance of the fund;

do all acts, whether or not expressly authorized, that the commissioner of revenue considers necessary or proper in administering the assets of the fund.

History.

(§ 5 ch 82 SLA 1992; am § 67 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendment to (4) of this section made by ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, is retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 37.14.530.
Use of fund.

The principal of the fund and any capital gains or losses realized on the principal shall be retained perpetually in the fund for investment as specified in AS

37.14.520

.

The net income account of the fund may be appropriated for the following purposes:

reimbursement to the Department of Revenue for the costs of establishing and managing the fund;

the administrative expenses of the Museum Collection Advisory Committee relating to acquisitions from the fund, as determined by the legislature;

acquisitions authorized by AS

14.57.100

—

14.57.199

; and

reimbursement of other costs of administration of the fund.

The balance remaining in the net income account that, at the end of the fiscal year, has not been appropriated, or that has been appropriated but not expended, shall be invested until appropriated or expended.

History.

(§ 5 ch 82 SLA 1992)

Sec. 37.14.540.
Definition.

In AS

37.14.500

—

37.14.540

, “fund” means the Alaska heritage endowment fund established by AS

37.14.500

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 82 SLA 1992)